Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2606
Relationship to other land-use law.

The Uniform Environmental Covenants Act does not authorize a use of real property that is otherwise prohibited by zoning, by law other than the act regulating use of real property, or by a recorded instrument that has priority over the environmental covenant. An environmental covenant may prohibit or restrict uses of real property which are authorized by zoning or by law other than the act.

Laws 2005, LB 298, § 7.